Hawaii statutes.
[§346-51.5] Expenditure of temporary
assistance for needy families funds. (a) Funds received by the State
under the temporary assistance for needy families program block grant shall be
subject to appropriation by the legislature and shall not be expended by the
department without a legislative appropriation.

(b) No later than thirty days before the
convening of each regular session, the department shall submit to the
legislature:

(1) A plan, developed in consultation with temporary
assistance for needy families program heads of households and other community
members familiar with such families' situations and needs, that:

(A) Details how the funds received under the
temporary assistance for needy families program shall be expended; and

(B) Describes the desired outcomes from the
expenditure of the funds;

(2) A report about the continuing strategic planning
process, with the assistance of the financial assistance advisory council, to:

(A) Involve the community in planning for the
future use of temporary assistance for needy families funds; and

(B) Set annual goals and outcomes for
existing and new programs receiving temporary assistance for needy families
funds,

pursuant to section 346-14.5; and

(3) A report on the effectiveness and level of success
in reaching the desired outcomes under:

(A) Paragraphs (1) and (2); and

(B) Programs from the previous two fiscal
years using temporary assistance for needy families funds.

(c) During the interim following the regular
session of 2006 and thereafter when the legislature is not in session, the
department may receive and expend federal funds related to the temporary
assistance for needy families program pursuant to [section] 346-8, subject to
approval by the governor, which are supplemental to the temporary assistance
for needy families block grant or are obtained competitively under the
temporary assistance for needy families program. The department shall submit
to the legislature a report no later than twenty days before the convening of
each regular session regarding:

(1) Any funds received and expended;

(2) The purposes for which the funds were expended;
and

(3) Outcomes achieved,

pursuant to this section. [L 2006, c 302, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next